src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON mag_verbs
! MAG- verbs
aral+V:aral V  "study" ;
basa+V:basa V  "read" ;
bigay+V:bigay V  "give" ;
dala+V:dala V  "give" ;
isip+V:isip V  "think" ;
lakad+V:lakad V  "walk" ;
linis+V:linis V  "clean" ;
salita+V:salita V  "talk or speak" ;
sara+V:sara V  "close" ;
saulo+V:saulo V  "memorize" ;
sepilyo+V:sepilyo V  "brush" ;
simula+V:simula V  "start" ;
sulat+V:sulat V  "write" ;
tanong+V:tanong V  "ask" ;

LEXICON ma_verbs
!! MA- verbs
basag+V:basag V  "break" ;
higa+V:higa V  "lie down" ;
kinig+V:kinig V  "listen" ;
ligo+V:ligo V  "bathe" ;
nalo+V:nalo V  "win (a game or competition)" ;
nood+V:nood V  "watch" ;
pasyol+V:pasyol V  "stroll" ;
talo+V:talo V  "lose (a game or competition)" ;
tulog+V:tulog V  "sleep" ;
tuto+V:tuto V  "learn" ;
upo+V:upo V  "sit" ;

LEXICON um_verbs
!! -UM- verbs
dumating+V:dumating um_infix  "arrive" ;
higa+V:higa um_infix  "lie down" ;
kain+V:kain um_infix  "eat" ;
kanta+V:kanta um_infix  "sing" ;
lakad+V:lakad um_infix  "walk" ;
pasok+V:pasok um_infix  "enter" ;
punta+V:punta um_infix  "go" ;
sigaw+V:sigaw um_infix  "shout" ;
takbo+V:takbo um_infix  "run" ;
tawa+V:tawa um_infix  "laugh" ;

LEXICON in_verbs
!! -IN- verbs
banggit+V:banggit in_infix  "mention" ;
basag+V:basag in_infix  "break" ;
bura+V:bura in_infix  "erase" ;
kain+V:kain in_infix  "eat" ;
pilit+V:pilit in_infix  "insist or force" ;
pitas+V:pitas in_infix  "pick or harvest" ;
sabi+V:sabi in_infix  "say" ;
sipa+V:sipa in_infix  "kick" ;
sira+V:sira in_infix  "destroy" ;
tawag+V:tawag in_infix  "call by name" ;
tonto+V:tonto in_infix "kid" ;

!! 2024-09-27 same value for different morphology
! mu-X +AF+Asp/Imp+Ind
!adto+V+AF+Asp/UND+Ind:muadto # "go" ;
!adto+V+AF+Asp/Imp+Ind:moadto # "go" ;
!balik+V+AF+Asp/Imp+Ind:mubalik # "return" ;
!inom+V+AF+Asp/Imp+Ind:muinom # "drink" ;
!lakaw+V+AF+Asp/Imp+Ind:mulakaw # "go.out" ;
!sayaw+V+AF+Asp/Imp+Ind:musayaw # "go.to.dance" ;

! mag-X +AF+Asp/Imp+Ind
!party+V+AF+Asp/Imp+Ind:magparty # "party" ;
!tuon+V+AF+Asp/Imp+Ind:magtuon # "study" ;

! ga-X +AF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!tindog+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:gatindog # "stand" ;

! nag-X +AF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!huna+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:naghuna # "think" ;
!kita+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind+Neutr/Yes:nagkitaay # "meet" ;
!tahi+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:nagtahi # "sew" ;
!tonto+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:nagtinonto # "kidding" ;

! ni-X +AF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!ambak+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:niambak # "jump" ;
!basa+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:nibasa # "read" ;
!kaon+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:nikaon # "eat" ;
!tan-aw+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:nitan-aw # "watch" ;

! ning-X +AF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!saad+V+AF+Asp/Perf+Ind:ningsaad # "promise" ;

! ma-X +AF+Asp/Prosp+Pot
!himo+V+AF+Asp/Prosp+Pot:mahimo # "could" ;

! ma-X-an +AF+Asp/Prosp+Pot
!init+V+AF+Asp/Prosp+Pot:mainitan # "exposed to the sun" ;

! maN-X +AF+Asp/Prosp+Ind
!kutana+V+AF+Asp/Prosp+Ind:mangutana # "ask.question" ;
!palit+V+AF+Asp/Prosp+Ind:mamalit # "buy" ;

! ma-X +AF+Asp/Prosp+Ind
!lipong+V+AF+Asp/Prosp+Ind:malipong # "paint" ;

! naN-X +AF+Asp/Prosp+Ind
!pupu+V+AF+Asp/Prosp+Ind:namupu # "pick" ;

! pag-X +AF+Asp/UND+Imp
!dali+V+AF+Asp/UND+Imp:pagdali # "hurry" ;
!pataka+V+AF+Asp/UND+Imp:pagpataka # "" ;

! pa-X +PF+Asp/Imp+Ind
!dulong+V+PF+Asp/Imp+Ind:padulong # "head.to" ;

! X-on +PF+Asp/Imp+Ind
!palit+V+PF+Asp/Imp+Ind:paliton # "buy" ;
!putol+V+PF+Asp/Imp+Ind:putlon # "cut" ;
!ligo+V+PF+Asp/Imp+Ind:liguon # "bathe" ;

! X-an +PF+Asp/Imp+Ind
!silhig+V+PF+Asp/Imp+Ind:silhigan # "sweep" ;
!tabang+V+PF+Asp/Imp+Ind:tabangan # "help" ;


! gi-X PF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!bayad+V+PF+Asp/Perf+Ind:gibayad # "pay" ;
!?kuha+V+PF+Asp/Perf+Ind:gikuha # "receive" ;
!tawag+V+PF+Asp/Perf+Ind:gitawag # "call" ;

! na-X PF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!?kuha+V+PF+Asp/Perf+Ind:nakuha # "receive" ;

! gi-X-an PF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!?maot+V+PF+Asp/Perf+Ind:gimaotan # "see.as.ugly" ;
! na-X-an PF+Asp/Perf+Ind
!?maot+V+PF+Asp/Perf+Ind:namaotan # "see.as.ugly" ;

! X-i +LF+Asp/UND+Imp
!palit+V+LF+Asp/UND+Imp:paliti # "buy" ;

! i-X +IF+Asp/UND+Imp
!pasa+V+IF+Asp/UND+Imp:ipasa # "pass" ;
